Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2916
Agreement; contents.

(1) If the parties involved in mediation reach an agreement, the agreement may be reduced to writing and signed by the parties. The agreement shall set forth the settlement of the issues and the future responsibilities of each party. If a court referred the case, the agreement as signed and approved by the parties may be presented to the court as a stipulation and, if approved by the court, shall be enforceable as an order of the court.

(2) If the parties involved in a restorative justice program reach a reparation plan agreement, the agreement may be reduced to writing and signed by the parties. The agreement shall set forth the reparations agreed upon by the parties to repair the specific circumstances of the offense. These may include, but are not limited to, service to the victim, an apology to the victim, financial restitution, services for the individual who caused the harm, community service, or any other reparation agreed upon by the parties. The agreement shall specify the time period during which such individual must comply with the requirements specified therein.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 17.